RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/ca_ES.dic
bajà/H
ballarí/GH
banyabaix/J
barbullós/J
barceloní/H
basardós/J
bastetà/H
bavarès/J
becari/K
beguí/H
bellugós/J
benaventurós/J
beneitó/H
benjamí/H
berguedà/H
berrugós/J
bibliotecari/K
bimà/H
binari/K
bituminós/J
bivitel·lí/H
bla/H
bledà/H
bocafluix/J
bocafí/H
bolivià/H
bondadós/J
bonifaci/K
borgià/H
borrós/J
boscà/H
bosquetà/H
botós/J
boví/H
brevilini/L
brillós/J
brità/H
bromós/J
bronzí/H
brovós/J
bru/H
burgès/J
butiraci/K
cadarnós/J
cagó/H
calamitós/J
calcari/K
caldós/J
calicí/H
calivós/J
calumniós/J
calè/H
cambrià/H
camforaci/K
cancerós/J
cantonès/J
caní/H
capcinès/J
capmoix/J
caputxí/H
carabrú/H
carcerari/K
carcinomatós/J
cardiaci/K
carlí/GH
carmesí/H
carpià/H
cartaci/K
cartaginès/J
cartesià/H
casolà/H
castel·là/H
catarqueà/H
catarrós/J
caucasià/H
cavil·lós/J
cebaci/K
cedrí/H
censatari/K
centè/H
cerebel·lós/J
ceroferari/K
cerverí/H
cesarià/H
cespitós/J
cessionari/K
cinc-centè/H
cinquantenari/K
cinquantè/H
cinquè/H
cirrós/J
cirurgià/H
cismuntà/H
citatori/K
ciutadà/H
clementí/H
cloritós/J
clovellós/J
coccigi/L
coccini/L
codolós/J
colombí/H
columnari/K
col·legatari/K
comanditari/K
comarcà/H
comendatari/K
comissari/K
comminatori/K
comodatari/K
compatró/H
compendiós/J
complementari/K
compromissari/K
comprès/J
compulsori/K
concessionari/K
conciutadà/H
conclòs/J
concrecionari/K
concussionari/K
confidenciari/K
conflentí/H
confusionari/K
confós/J
conidiogen/K
conquès/J
conservatori/K
consiliari/K
consuetudinari/K
contenciós/J
contestà/H
contradictori/K
contrari/K
contús/J
convocatori/K
copernicà/H
copiós/J
coplanari/K
coral·lí/H
coreligionari/K
corfós/J
corol·lí/H
coronari/K
corsari/K
cortès/J
cossetà/H
cranià/H
crapulós/J
cretaci/K
criptocristal·lí/H
cristal·lí/H
cromós/J
crustaci/K
cuafí/H
culpós/J
culterà/H
curvilini/L
daci/K
dacoromanès/J
daltonià/H
damasquí/H
danubià/H
declamatori/K
declinatori/K
decorós/J
dedicatori/K
degà/H
delegatori/K
deliciós/J
demeritori/K
democratacristià/H
demès/J
denegatori/K
denunciatori/K
deprecatori/K
derisori/K
desairós/J
desatès/J
descompromès/J
desenari/K
desentès/J
desitjós/J
despossessori/K
destinatari/K
desè/H
devonià/H
dextrors/J
diari/K
diclí/H
dignatari/K
dilatori/K
dinerari/K
dinovè/H
dipsogen/K
discriminatori/K
disgraciós/J
dissetè/H
distès/J
divisori/K
divuitè/H
dolç/J
domiciliari/K
dominicà/H
dori/K
dotzè/H
dretà/H
fabulós/J
facundiós/J
fadrí/H
fagocitari/K
famós/J
fanfarró/H
farinaci/K
farinós/J
fartó/H
fatigós/J
felicià/H
felí/H
fenià/H
ferroviari/K
ferruginós/J
festós/J
fi/GH
fibrinogen/K
fibrós/J
fiduciari/K
filonià/H
filós/J
fix/J
flexuós/J
fluxionari/K
fogós/J
formulari/K
formós/J
forà/H
fotogen/K
fragmentari/K
fragorós/J
francià/H
fredolí/H
fredorós/J
freturós/J
frigi/L
frisó/H
fructuós/J
frumentaci/K
frustratori/K
fuliginós/J
fulmini/DL
fumigatori/K
funerari/K
furiós/J
futurari/K
gadità/H
galtaplè/H
gal·linaci/K
gal·loromà/H
gal·lès/J
gandesà/H
ganyó/H
garrotxí/H
gascó/H
gasós/J
gelós/J
georgià/H
geostacionari/K
germanós/J
gibel·lí/H
ginebrí/H
gironí/H
glandulós/J
glicogen/K
globós/J
glumaci/K
golós/J
gongorí/H
grafitós/J
granollerí/H
granulomatós/J
gravitatori/K
grecollatí/H
greixós/J
grisó/H
groenlandès/J
guardià/H
guerxós/J
guipuscoà/H
gustatori/K
hiperfí/HVY
hipofisiari/KVY
hispanoamericà/HVY
histogen/KVY
hitlerià/HVY
humitós/JVY
iacetà/H
iberollatí/HVY
igualadí/HVY
igualitari/KVY
il·lusori/KVY
il·lès/JVY
immeritori/KVY
immissari/KVY
immunitari/KVY
imperatori/KVY
imperiós/JVY
impietós/JVY
implacentari/KVY
importú/HVY
improperiós/JVY
incendiari/KVY
incestuós/JVY
incomplex/JVY
increpatori/KVY
incurós/JVY
indagatori/KVY
indefens/JVY
indoari/KVY
inextens/JVY
inflamatori/KVY
infrahumà/HVY
infós/JVY
inhospitalari/KVY
injuriós/JVY
inoportú/HVY
insatisfactori/KVY
inspiratori/KVY
insuls/JVY
insà/HVY
interdisciplinari/KVY
intermediari/KVY
interurbà/HVY
intestí/HVY
intimatori/KVY
intracomunitari/KVY
intravenós/JVY
inurbà/HVY
invocatori/KVY
iraquià/HVY
iridós/JVY
irrespectuós/JVY
irrisori/KVY
isabelí/HVY
israelià/HVY
itinerari/KVY
jacetà/H
jactanciós/J
jocós/J
jordà/H
jovià/H
judeocatalà/H
judiciari/K
judiciós/J
jussà/H
kantià/H
kenyà/H
kuwaitià/H
lacetà/H
laci/K
laietà/H
laminós/J
laosià/H
lapidari/K
lapó/H
latitudinari/K
lauraci/K
laurini/L
lax/J
legatari/K
legionari/K
lesbià/H
levorotatori/K
liberià/H
libidinós/J
liliaci/K
literari/K
litigiós/J
lituà/H
llandós/J
llardissós/J
llavifès/J
lleganyós/J
llegendari/K
lleidatà/H
llentillós/J
llepó/H
lletós/J
llis/J
lluminós/J
llunyedà/H
longilini/L
lusità/H
luxemburguès/J
mafiós/J
magrebí/H
mahometà/H
majoritari/K
malacopterigi/L
malairós/J
malcurós/J
malgustós/J
malmirrós/J
malplà/H
malsonyós/J
manacorí/H
mandatari/K
mandrós/J
mans/J
manyà/H
manós/J
marià/H
marmori/K
marsellès/J
marí/H
masturbatori/K
maurità/H
medicamentós/J
melindrós/J
membranaci/K
memoriós/J
mendelià/H
mercenari/K
meritós/J
merí/H
metropolità/H
micaci/K
migranyós/J
migratori/K
mil·lenari/K
milè/H
miraculós/J
mix/J
mixtilini/L
mobiliari/EK
mogrebí/H
molestós/J
monitori/K
monocristal·lí/H
montpellerí/H
morbós/J
morfogen/K
mormó/H
mossegós/J
mucós/J
multimilionari/K
mundà/H
murmuriós/J
murrí/H
musivari/K
narratori/K
necessari/K
necessitós/J
nectari/K
negrelló/H
neguitós/J
neogen/K
neperià/H
nerviós/J
nestorià/H
nigerocongolès/J
niloticosaharià/H
nitrós/J
nonagenari/K
norantí/H
notori/K
novaiorquès/J
nyafegós/J
padrí/H
paleaci/K
paleocristià/H
pallós/J
palmari/K
palmesà/H
pamplonès/J
papilionaci/K
papulós/J
parcel·lari/K
parlamentari/K
parmesà/H
partisà/H
pastós/J
patibulari/K
paulí/H
pecuari/K
pegallós/J
penitenciari/K
penià/H
pensarós/J
perdulari/K
perennifoli/K
peresós/J
permissionari/K
permià/H
perpinyanès/J
perspiratori/K
pesarós/J
petitori/K
piadós/J
picó/GH
pietós/J
pigós/J
piogen/K
pirolignós/J
piscatori/K
placentari/K
planetari/K
planocaducifoli/K
plantós/J
plaquetari/K
ple/H
plenari/K
plorallós/J
plumbós/J
pluridisciplinari/K
pobletà/H
pollencí/H
pollós/J
polsós/J
ponentí/H
poregós/J
porraci/K
porós/J
possessori/K
postmeridià/H
precari/K
precipitós/J
premonstratès/J
preoperatori/K
presbiterià/H
presidiari/K
prestatari/K
presumptuós/J
prioritari/K
prodigiós/J
proditori/K
proletari/K
prolix/J
propiciatori/K
prostibulari/K
proterviós/J
protestatari/K
provincià/H
provisori/K
psicogen/K
pudós/J
purificatori/K
purpurí/H
puçós/J
quarteró/GH
quaternari/K
queixós/J
quinquagenari/K
quistós/J
quotidià/H
radiós/J
rancuniós/J
ratxós/J
reaccionari/K
recaptós/J
recordatori/K
rectilini/L
redhibitori/K
referendari/K
reflex/J
reformatori/K
refutatori/K
regató/GH
reguardós/J
reivindicatori/K
rellentós/J
remissori/K
remís/J
renunciatari/K
replè/H
repropiós/J
reprovatori/K
requisitori/K
rescriptori/K
resolutori/K
restitutori/K
retransmès/J
reverberatori/K
revolucionari/K
reïnós/J
ripollès/J
ripuari/K
rocós/J
rodanxó/H
romanès/J
rosaci/K
rossellonès/J
rotatori/K
ruborós/J
rumiós/J
rutinari/K
ruà/H
saborós/J
sacarí/H
sacrococcigi/L
sagnós/J
saguntí/H
saltuari/K
salvatgí/H
samoà/H
sanguinari/K
sanitós/J
saponaci/K
saulós/J
saurí/H
sebaci/K
secardí/H
secretori/K
secundari/K
sedimentari/K
sedimentós/J
selaci/K
selvatà/H
senegalès/J
sensori/K
septuagenari/K
serè/H
setmesó/H
sexagenari/K
shakespearià/H
siamès/J
silesià/H
sis-centè/H
sobrehumà/H
sobreprès/J
solidari/K
solutrià/H
sorollós/J
subalpí/H
subcontrari/K
suberós/J
substitutori/K
suecà/H
sumatori/K
sumptuós/J
suplementari/K
supramundà/H
tailandès/J
tamarità/H
tarragoní/H
tavernari/K
teatí/H
tel·lurós/J
tens/J
teratogen/K
tertulià/H
testaci/K
tibetà/H
tireganyós/J
tocatardà/H
tornès/J
toscà/H
tradicionari/K
tragitós/J
treballós/J
trempolí/H
tretzè/H
tributari/K
tripolità/H
tuberós/J
tufaci/K
turquí/H
ubiqüitari/KVY
ugandès/JVY
ultradretà/HVY
universitari/KVY
untuós/JVY
uralià/HVY
uruguaià/HVY
usurari/KVY
valencià/H
valuós/J
varsovià/H
vellós/J
venatori/K
venecià/H
vergonyós/J
verós/J
vesí/H
vexatori/K
vicissitudinari/K
vigatà/H
vilatà/H
vilipendiós/J
viperí/H
vitulí/H
vituperiós/J
voluntari/K
vuitantí/H
vulturí/H
xafallós/J
xarxó/H
xicó/H
zelós/J
